Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5812.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-7 of the General Laws entitled "Liability Insurance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-7-1.1. Wasting policies prohibited.
Every policy written insuring against liability for property damage or personal injuries or
both, and every policy written indemnifying any person by reason of that liability, other than the
payment of compensation under chapters 29 through 38 of title 28, shall state a policy limit to be
available in full for payment of such claims. No portion of the policy limit may be used for the
payment of fees or costs to defend a claim.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002296
========